Illinois, session 104th, HB1122.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Community-Integrated Living Arrangements 5Licensure and Certification Act is amended by changing Section 613.2 as follows: 7    (210 ILCS 135/13.2)8    Sec. 13.2. Emergency notification. Any facility licensed 9under this Act shall notify the Department when emergency 10calls are made from the facility, regardless of whether the 11Office of the Inspector General has substantiated the 12allegations or the call resulted in a criminal charge, arrest, 13or incarceration. The Department shall adopt any rules 14necessary to implement this Section, including, but not 15limited to, a definition for "emergency calls" and reporting 16procedures and protocols and penalties for failing to report.17(Source: P.A. 101-75, eff. 1-1-20.)